Arkansas, session 2025, HB1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Presumptive eligibility for pregnant women.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall make presumptive eligibility
determinations for pregnant women who are applying for the program to improve
access to prenatal care and allow prenatal care to be delivered immediately
while waiting for a full application to be processed.
(b) The program may designate one (1) or more qualified entities to
screen for eligibility and immediately enroll pregnant women into the
program.






*JMB080*
11/21/2024 8:45:31 AM JMB080